Louisiana, session 2026, HB162.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 33:9097.12(F)(1) and (3)(a)(i) are hereby amended and reenacted to
read as follows:
§9097.12. Jefferson Place/Bocage Crime Prevention and Improvement District
* * *
F. Parcel fee. The district, through the board, is hereby authorized to impose
and collect a parcel fee within the district subject to and in accordance with the
provisions of this Subsection.
(1) The amount of the fee shall be as requested by duly adopted resolution
of the board. The fee shall be a flat fee per improved parcel of land not to exceed
five hundred and forty one thousand two hundred dollars per year for each improved
parcel, starting with five hundred one thousand dollars for the first calendar year.
* * *
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 162 ENROLLED
(3)(a)(i) The fee of five hundred one thousand dollars for the first calendar
year, subject to change thereafter by duly adopted resolution of the board, not to
exceed the maximum amount authorized as provided in this Subsection, shall be
imposed only after the question of its imposition and the board's authority to increase
the fee has been approved by a majority of the registered voters of the district who
vote on the proposition at an election held for that purpose in accordance with the
Louisiana Election Code.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.